src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-aambaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āmbaz: # Noun 173 'eng /est hammas/fin' - full paradigm
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Nom: āmbaz
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Gen: ambõ
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Par: āmbazt
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Dat: ambõn
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Ins: ambõks
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Ill: [ambõz, ambõ]
     āmbaz+N+Sg+Ela: ambõst
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Nom: ambõd
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Gen: ambõd
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Par: ambidi
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Dat: ambõdõn
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Ins: ambõdõks
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Ill: ambiž
     āmbaz+N+Pl+Ela: ambist
